Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2197.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5822YH (4) 91 th/ns H.F. 2197 Section 1. Section 322A.5, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code 1 2026, is amended by striking the paragraph and inserting in 2 lieu thereof the following: 3 b. A franchiser shall pay the franchisee for warranty 4 services, including for parts, labor, and diagnostics, an 5 amount not less than the rates and labor times charged by the 6 franchisee for like parts and services to retail customers, 7 provided the rates and labor times are reasonable. A 8 franchisee shall provide to the franchiser an itemized list of 9 rates and labor times for warranty services performed by the 10 franchisee. 11 Sec. 2. Section 322A.5, subsection 2, paragraph c, Code 12 2026, is amended to read as follows: 13 c. The franchiser shall provide to the franchisee a list of 14 time allowances for the performance of warranty services. Time 15 allowances for the performance of A franchisee shall perform 16 warranty services, including diagnostic services, shall be in a 17 reasonable and adequate for the services to be performed amount 18 of time . 19 Sec. 3. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to franchises under 20 chapter 322A entered into or renewed on or after the effective 21 date of this Act. 22